test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-neiqbb_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - neiʹbb â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     neiʹbb+N+Sg+Nom: neiʹbb
     neiʹbb+N+Sg+Gen: neeiʹb
     neiʹbb+N+Sg+Acc: neeiʹb
     neiʹbb+N+Sg+Ill: neibba
     neiʹbb+N+Sg+Loc: neeiʹbest
     neiʹbb+N+Sg+Com: neeiʹbin
     neiʹbb+N+Ess: neiʹbben
     neiʹbb+N+Par: neiʹbbed
     neiʹbb+N+Sg+Abe: [neeiʹbtaa, neeiʹbtää]
     neiʹbb+N+Pl+Nom: neeiʹb
     neiʹbb+N+Pl+Gen: neeiʹbi
     neiʹbb+N+Pl+Acc: neeiʹbid
     neiʹbb+N+Pl+Ill: neeiʹbid
     neiʹbb+N+Pl+Loc: neeiʹbin
     neiʹbb+N+Pl+Com: neeiʹbivuiʹm
     neiʹbb+N+Pl+Abe: [neeiʹbitaa, neeiʹbitää]
